Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.26
Adulterated commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; distribution unlawful; how determined.

No person shall distribute any adulterated commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance. A commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

(1) It contains any toxic materials, other than pesticides registered pursuant to law, in quantities injurious to plant or animal health;

(2) Any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or subtracted therefrom or any less valuable substance substituted therefor;

(3) Its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its label;

(4) Warning statements or directions for use, as prescribed by the director to be shown on the label, are not displayed thereon; or

(5) It contains amounts of crop seed, weed seed, or other foreign materials in excess of tolerances as may be adopted and promulgated by rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 11;

Laws 1980, LB 889, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 32.
March 17, 2026